District of Columbia statutes.
8-1904

Dangerous dog and potentially dangerous dog registration requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue a certificate of registration to the owner of a potentially dangerous dog if the owner establishes to the satisfaction of the Mayor that:

(1)

The owner of the potentially dangerous dog is 18 years of age or older;

(2)

A valid license has been issued for the potentially dangerous dog pursuant to District law;

(3)

The potentially dangerous dog has current vaccinations;

(4)

The owner has a proper enclosure, as determined by the Mayor, to confine the potentially dangerous dog;

(5)

The owner has paid an annual fee in an amount to be determined by the Mayor, in addition to regular dog licensing fees, to register the potentially dangerous dog;

(6)

The potentially dangerous dog has been spayed or neutered;

(7)

The potentially dangerous dog has been implanted with a microchip containing owner identification information; and

(8)

The owner has written permission of the property owner, if the dog owner is not the property owner, and from a homeowner’s association, if appropriate, to house the dog on the premises where the dog will be kept.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue a certificate of registration to the owner of a dangerous dog if the owner, in addition to satisfying the requirements for registration of a potentially dangerous dog pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, establishes to the satisfaction of the Mayor that the owner of the dangerous dog has posted on the premises a clearly visible, printed warning sign, in type that is readable from not less than 50 feet, that there is a dangerous dog on the property, and that includes a conspicuous warning symbol that informs children of the presence of a dangerous dog.

History

Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176, § 5, 35 DCR 4787
Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 105(d), 55 DCR 9186

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1903, § 8-1905, and § 8-1906.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1021.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-281 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of a § 6-1021.4a, see § 2(e) of the Pit Bull and Rottweiler Dangerous Dog Designation Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-257, April 16, 1996, 43 DCR 2156).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(e) of the Dangerous Dog Designation Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-351, August 12, 1996, 43 DCR 4553).
For temporary addition of a § 6-1024.4a 1981 Ed., see § 3(f) of the Dangerous Dog Designation Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-351, August 12, 1996, 43 DCR 4553).